Hawaii statutes.
§572-15 Delivery of records to department
of health; penalty. Whenever any agent authorized to grant marriage
licenses ceases to be an agent, or is directed to do so by the department of
health, or leaves the State, the agent shall deliver to the department all the
agent's records of marriage licenses. Upon the death of any such agent such
records shall be delivered to the department by the agent's personal
representative or other legal representative.

Whenever any person holding a license to
perform the marriage ceremony is directed to do so by the department, or
whenever the license is canceled or otherwise terminated or upon the departure
from the State of any such person, the person shall deliver to the department
all the person's records of marriages, or upon the death of any such person
such records shall be delivered to the department by the person's personal
representative, or other legal representative.

Any person violating this section shall be
fined not more than $500. [L 1864, p 22; am L 1903, c 8, §2; RL 1925, §2953; am
L 1929, c 104, §7; am L 1931, c 65, §2; RL 1935, §4643; RL 1945, §12364; RL
1955, §323-15; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §572-15; am L 1976, c 200, pt of
§1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next